Washington statutes.
RCW 7.64.100

Claim by third party.

If the property taken by the sheriff is claimed by any person other than the defendant or the defendant's agent, the claimant may assert the claim by intervening in the plaintiff's action for possession.

[ 1990 c 227 s 7; 1979 ex.s. c 132 s 4; Code 1881 s 151; 1877 p 32 s 151; 1869 p 37 s 149; 1854 p 151 s 109; RRS s 716.]